Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-511
Rule 511. Waiver of privilege by voluntary disclosure.

A person upon whom these rules confer a privilege against disclosure of a confidential matter or communication waives the privilege if he or his predecessor, while holder of the privilege, voluntarily discloses or consents to disclosure of any significant part of the matter or communication. This rule does not apply if the disclosure is itself a privileged communication.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 31.